Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 5. Small Claims Court.

§ 16.1-122.1.
Small claims court; designated.

On or before July 1, 1999, each general district court shall establish, using existing facilities, a small claims division to be designated a small claims court.

Such courts shall not have jurisdiction over suits against the Commonwealth under the Virginia Tort Claims Act (§

8.01-195.1

et seq.) or suits against any officer or employee of the Commonwealth for claims arising out of the performance of their official duties or responsibilities.

History.

1988, c. 799; 1989, c. 451; 1990, c. 564; 1994, c. 576; 1995, c. 589; 1998, cc. 656, 779.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1988, c. 799, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 1990, c. 565, cl. 1, Acts 1993, c. 593, cl. 1, and Acts 1997, c. 253, cl. 1, provides that the provisions of the 1988 act, which enacted this article, shall become effective October 1, 1988, and no longer expire on July 1, 1998. The 1997 amendment by c. 253 deleted the provisions which had provided for the expiration of this article on July 1, 1998.

Acts 1996, c. 1033, cl. 1, provides: “The Cities of Harrisonburg and Richmond and the Counties of Brunswick, Greensville, Roanoke, Rockingham and Washington are hereby authorized to establish within their general district court a small claims court division, which shall be designated the small claims court, pursuant to the provisions of §

16.1-122.1

.”

Acts 1997, c. 253, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 1998, cc. 656 and 779, cl. 2, provides: “That any small claims court created prior to July 1, 1999, shall continue in effect.”

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendments by cc. 656 and 779 are identical and rewrote this section.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Courts, § 41.

§ 16.1-122.2.
Jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the small claims court shall have jurisdiction, concurrent with that of the general district court, over the civil action specified in §

16.1-77 (1)

when the amount claimed does not exceed $5,000, exclusive of interest.

History.

1988, c. 799; 2002, c. 704; 2006, c. 141.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 704 substituted “$2,000” for “$1,000.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 141 substituted “$5,000” for “$2,000.”

§ 16.1-122.3.
Actions; how commenced; notice; continuances; pleadings.

Actions in the small claims court shall be commenced by the filing of a small claims civil warrant by a plaintiff.

At the time of filing a small claims civil warrant, the plaintiff shall pay to the clerk a required fee, which will be taxed as costs in the case. The plaintiff may be afforded the opportunity to receive preprinted information promulgated by the Committee on District Courts explaining the small claims court, including but not limited to information on case preparation, courtroom procedures, methods of collection, removal rights and appeals. The plaintiff shall select a time for the hearing which shall be held at least five days after service of the warrant. Such time shall be subject to concurrence by the clerk’s office. The chief judge may limit the number of cases any one person may set for trial on any one date.

Upon the filing of the small claims civil warrant in small claims court, the court shall cause notice of process to be served upon the defendant. Notice of process shall consist of a copy of the warrant and shall be served by the method used in general district court. If applicable, the defendant shall be served with a copy of the preprinted information identified in subsection B of this section attached to the copy of the civil warrant.

All forms required by this article shall be prescribed by the Supreme Court of Virginia.

The trial shall be conducted on the first return date. However, by consent of all parties or upon order of the court, the time for trial may be changed from the time set for the first return. A continuance shall be granted to either the plaintiff or defendant only upon good cause shown.

There shall be no pleadings in small claims court actions other than the warrant and answer, grounds of defense and counterclaims not to exceed $5,000.

History.

1988, c. 799; 1990, c. 564; 2002, c. 704; 2006, c. 141.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 704 substituted “$2,000” for “$1,000” in subsection F.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 141 substituted “$5,000” for “$2,000” in subsection F.

§ 16.1-122.4.
Representation and removal; rights of parties.

All parties shall be represented by themselves in actions before the small claims court except as follows:

A corporate or partnership plaintiff or defendant may be represented by an owner, a general partner, an officer or an employee of that corporation or partnership who shall have all the rights and privileges given an individual to represent, plead and try a case without an attorney. An attorney may serve in this capacity if he is appearing pro se, but he may not serve in a representative capacity.

A plaintiff or defendant who, in the judge’s opinion, is unable to understand or participate on his own behalf in the hearing may be represented by a friend or relative if the representative is familiar with the facts of the case and is not an attorney.

A defendant shall have the right to remove the case to the general district court at any point preceding the handing down of the decision by the judge and may be represented by an attorney for that purpose.

History.

1988, c. 799; 1997, c. 243; 2001, c. 74.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 74 inserted “and may be represented by an attorney for that purpose” at the end of subsection B.

§ 16.1-122.5.
Informal hearings; rules of evidence suspended.

In trials before the small claims court, witnesses shall be sworn. The general district court judge shall conduct the trial in an informal manner so as to do substantial justice between the parties. The judge shall have the discretion to admit all evidence which may be of probative value although not in accordance with formal rules of practice, procedure, pleading or evidence, except that privileged communications shall not be admissible. The object of such trials shall be to determine the rights of the litigants on the merits and to dispense expeditious justice between the parties.

History.

1988, c. 799.

§ 16.1-122.6.
Judgment and collection.

The small claims court shall follow the procedures of the general district court in judgment and collection.

History.

1988, c. 799.

§ 16.1-122.7.
Appeals.

Appeals from the small claims court shall be as in other cases from the general district court.

History.

1988, c. 799.